Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.15.010

Electronic filing—Availability. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

(1) For each required report, as technology permits, the commission shall make an electronic reporting tool available to all those who are required to file that report under this title.

(2) All persons required to file reports under this title must file them electronically where the commission has provided an electronic option. The executive director may make exceptions on a case-by-case basis for persons who lack the technological ability to file reports electronically.

(3) If the electronic filing system provided by the commission is inoperable for any period of time, the commission must keep a record of the date and time of each instance and post outages on its website. If a report is due on a day the electronic filing system is inoperable, it is not late if filed the first business day the system is back in operation. The commission must provide notice to all reporting entities when the system is back in operation.

(4) All persons required to file reports under this title shall, at the time of initial filing, provide the commission an email address, or other electronic contact information, that shall constitute the official address for purposes of all communications from the commission. The person required to file one or more reports must provide any new electronic contact information to the commission within 10 days, if the address has changed from that listed on the most recent report. Committees must provide the committee treasurer's electronic contact information to the commission. Committees must also provide any new electronic contact information for the committee's treasurer to the commission within 10 days of the change. The executive director may waive the electronic contact information requirement and allow use of a postal address, upon the showing of hardship.

[ 2024 c 164 s 404; 2019 c 428 s 4; 2018 c 304 s 3; 2013 c 166 s 2; 2010 c 204 s 202; 2000 c 237 s 3; 1999 c 401 s 11. Formerly RCW 42.17A.055, 42.17.369.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Finding—Effective date—2019 c 428: See notes following RCW 29B.20.110.

Finding—Intent—2018 c 304: See note following RCW 29B.25.090.

Effective date—2013 c 166: "This act takes effect January 1, 2014." [ 2013 c 166 s 3.]

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 101-504, 506-601, 603-702, and 801-1103: "Sections 101 through 504, 506 through 601, 603 through 702, and 801 through 1103 of chapter 204, Laws of 2010 take effect January 1, 2012." [ 2010 1st sp.s. c 26 s 10; 2010 c 204 s 1105. Formerly RCW 42.17A.918.]